Indiana, session 2026, HB1200.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-30-2-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2023 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 3. A contract may not be awarded
under this article to a progressive design-builder (as defined in
IC 8-23-9.5-10).
SECTION 2. IC 8-14-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.173-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The funds allocated to the respective
counties of the state from the motor vehicle highway account shall
annually be budgeted as provided by law, and, when distributed shall
be used for construction, reconstruction, preservation, and maintenance
of the highways of the respective counties, including highways which
traverse the streets of incorporated towns, the cost of the repair and
maintenance of which prior to the tenth day of September, 1932, was
paid from the county gravel road repair fund excepting where the
department is charged by law with the maintenance or construction of
any such highway so traversing such streets. Subject to subsection (b),
any surplus existing in the funds at the end of the year shall thereafter
continue as a part of the highway funds of the said counties and shall
be rebudgeted and used as already provided in this chapter. The
purchase, rental and repair of highway equipment, painting of bridges
and acquisition of grounds for erection and construction of storage
HEA 1200 — CC 1

2
buildings, acquisition of rights of way and the purchase of fuel oil, and
supplies necessary to the performance of construction, reconstruction,
preservation, and maintenance of highways, shall be paid out of the
highway account of the various counties.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) and section 4.1 of this
chapter, for funds distributed to a county from the motor vehicle
highway account, the county shall use at least fifty percent (50%) of the
money for the construction, reconstruction, and preservation of the
county's highways.
(c) This subsection applies to a county containing a consolidated
city. For funds distributed to a county from the motor vehicle highway
account, the county shall use at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the
money for the construction, reconstruction, and preservation of the
county's highways.
(d) A county, including a county containing a consolidated city,
may not budget or designate any funds that are distributed to the
county from the motor vehicle highway account for a project to be
selected by an individual member of the county fiscal body.
SECTION 3. IC 8-14-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 292, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The state comptroller shall
establish a special account to be called the "local road and street
account" and credit this account monthly with thirty-seven percent
(37%) of the money deposited in the highway, road and street fund.
(b) The state comptroller shall distribute to units of local
government money from this account each month. Before making any
other distributions under this chapter, the state comptroller shall
distribute E85 incentive payments to all political subdivisions entitled
to a payment under section 8 of this chapter.
(c) After distributing E85 incentive payments required under section
8 of this chapter, the state comptroller shall allocate to each county the
remaining money in this account on the basis of the ratio of each
county's passenger car registrations to the total passenger car
registrations of the state. The state comptroller shall further determine
the suballocation between the county and the cities within the county
as follows:
(1) In counties having a population of more than fifty thousand
(50,000), sixty percent (60%) of the money shall be distributed on
the basis of the population of the city or town as a percentage of
the total population of the county and forty percent (40%)
distributed on the basis of the ratio of city and town street mileage
to county road mileage.
HEA 1200 — CC 1

3
(2) In counties having a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or
less, twenty percent (20%) of the money shall be distributed on
the basis of the population of the city or town as a percentage of
the total population of the county and eighty percent (80%)
distributed on the basis of the ratio of city and town street mileage
to county road mileage.
(3) For the purposes of allocating funds as provided in this
section, towns which become incorporated as a town between the
effective dates of decennial censuses shall be eligible for
allocations upon the effectiveness of a corrected population count
for the town under IC 1-1-3.5.
(4) Money allocated under the provisions of this section to
counties containing a consolidated city shall be credited or
allocated to the department of transportation of the consolidated
city.
(d) Each month the state comptroller shall inform the department of
the amounts allocated to each unit of local government from the local
road and street account.
(e) A county, including a county containing a consolidated city,
may not budget or designate any funds that are distributed to the
county from the local road and street account for a project to be
selected by an individual member of the county fiscal body.
SECTION 4. IC 8-23-9.5-0.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2023 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 0.1. It is the
intent of the general assembly that this chapter applies only to a
contract for the delivery of a project of the department. This
chapter does not apply to a contract for the delivery of a project of
a public agency (as defined in IC 5-30-1-11).
SECTION 5. IC 8-23-9.5-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.60-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) Upon approval of the final scoring of the
CMGCs or the PDBs by the commissioner, the department shall enter
into negotiations with the CMGC or PDB with the highest score as
determined under section 17 of this chapter for a contract.
(b) If the department is unable to negotiate a contract with the
person with the highest score for an amount of compensation that the
department and the person determine to be fair and reasonable, the
department shall terminate negotiations with that person. The
department or its authorized representative may then undertake
negotiations with the person with the next highest score and continue
in this manner until an agreement is reached or until a determination
HEA 1200 — CC 1

4
is made by the department to reject all proposals submitted under this
chapter.
(c) If the department does not receive at least two (2) proposals, the
department may not enter into a contract under this chapter.
(d) The department may only enter into a contract for services under
this chapter for not more than two (2) five (5) projects each calendar
year.
SECTION 6. IC 9-18.1-5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.63-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. (a) The supplemental fee in this section
applies after December 31, 2017, to each electric vehicle and hybrid
vehicle that is required to be registered under this article. The
supplemental fee in this section does not apply to vehicles subject to
the motor carrier fuel tax under IC 6-6-4.1, low speed vehicles, or
motor driven cycles.
(b) As used in this section, "electric vehicle" means a vehicle that:
(1) is propelled by an electric motor powered by a battery or other
electrical device incorporated into the vehicle; and
(2) is not propelled by an engine powered by the combustion of
a hydrocarbon fuel, including gasoline, diesel, propane, or liquid
natural gas.
(c) As used in this section, "hybrid vehicle" means a vehicle that:
(1) draws propulsion energy from both an internal combustion
engine and an energy storage device; and
(2) employs a regenerative braking system to recover waste
energy to charge the energy storage device that is providing
propulsion energy.
(d) In addition to any other fee required to register an electric
vehicle under this chapter, the supplemental fee to register an electric
vehicle is one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The bureau shall determine
a new fee amount to take effect as of January 1 of the following year by
determining the product of the following:
(1) Before October 1, 2023:
(A) the fee in effect for the determination year; multiplied by
(B) the factor determined under IC 6-6-1.6-2(b).
(2) Before October 1 of each year thereafter:
(A) the fee in effect for the determination year; multiplied by
(B) the factor determined under IC 6-6-1.6-3.
The fee shall be rounded to the nearest dollar.
(e) In addition to any other fee required to register a hybrid vehicle
under this chapter, the supplemental fee to register a hybrid vehicle is
fifty dollars ($50). The bureau shall determine a new fee amount to
HEA 1200 — CC 1

5
take effect as of January 1 of the following year by determining the
product of the following:
(1) Before October 1, 2023:
(A) the fee in effect for the determination year; multiplied by
(B) the factor determined under IC 6-6-1.6-2(b).
(2) Before October 1 of each year thereafter:
(A) the fee in effect for the determination year; multiplied by
(B) the factor determined under IC 6-6-1.6-3.
The fee shall be rounded to the nearest dollar.
(f) The fee shall be deposited in the local road and bridge matching
grant fund established by IC 8-23-30-2.
SECTION 7. IC 9-18.5-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2022,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) A person may apply to the bureau for
a personalized license plate to display on the person's vehicle.
(b) The following license plates may be designed as a personalized
license plate under this chapter:
(1) IC 9-18.5-4 (prisoner of war license plates).
(2) IC 9-18.5-5 (disabled Hoosier veteran license plates).
(3) IC 9-18.5-6 (Purple Heart license plates).
(4) IC 9-18.5-7 (National Guard license plates).
(5) IC 9-18.5-8 (license plates for persons with disabilities).
(6) IC 9-18.5-9 (amateur radio operator license plates).
(7) IC 9-18.5-10 (civic event license plates).
(8) IC 9-18.5-11 (In God We Trust license plates).
(9) IC 9-18.5-12 (special group recognition license plates).
(10) IC 9-18.5-13 (environmental license plates).
(11) IC 9-18.5-14 (kids first trust license plates).
(12) IC 9-18.5-15 (education license plates).
(13) IC 9-18.5-16 (Indiana FFA trust license plates).
(14) IC 9-18.5-17 (Indiana firefighter license plates).
(15) IC 9-18.5-18 (Indiana boy scouts trust license plates).
(16) IC 9-18.5-19 (D.A.R.E. Indiana trust license plates).
(17) IC 9-18.5-20 (Indiana arts trust license plates).
(18) IC 9-18.5-21 (Indiana health trust license plates).
(19) IC 9-18.5-22 (Indiana Native American trust license plates).
(20) IC 9-18.5-23 (Safety First license plates).
(20) (21) IC 9-18.5-24 (Pearl Harbor survivor license plates).
(21) (22) IC 9-18.5-25 (Indiana state educational institution trust
license plates).
(22) (23) IC 9-18.5-26 (Lewis and Clark expedition license
plates).
HEA 1200 — CC 1

6
(23) (24) IC 9-18.5-27 (Riley Children's Foundation license
plates).
(24) (25) IC 9-18.5-28 (National Football League franchised
professional football team license plates).
(25) (26) IC 9-18.5-29 (Hoosier veteran license plates).
(26) (27) IC 9-18.5-30 (support our troops license plates).
(27) (28) IC 9-18.5-31 (Abraham Lincoln's boyhood home license
plates).
(28) (29) IC 9-18.5-33 (Indiana Gold Star family member license
plates).
(30) IC 9-18.5-34 (Historic vehicles).
(29) (31) IC 9-18.5-35 (Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal
license plates).
(32) IC 9-18.5-36 (Semiquincentennial license plates).
(30) (33) A license plate issued under IC 9-18 (before its
expiration) or IC 9-18.1.
SECTION 8. IC 9-18.5-3-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 327, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) License plates shall be issued
to the following:
(1) Members of the general assembly.
(2) Spouses of members of the general assembly.
(3) Other state officials who receive special license plates on an
annual basis.
(b) A license plate issued under this chapter may also be issued to
a company or business owned by a person described in subsection (a).
(c) A license plate issued under this chapter may be designed in
an alternate color scheme version.
(d) A license plate issued under this chapter that is designed in
an alternate color scheme version is subject to the fee described in
IC 9-18.5-2-8(3).
SECTION 9. IC 9-19-12-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. A motor vehicle that
is constructed or loaded so as to obstruct the driver's view to the rear
from the driver's position must be equipped with either:
(1) a mirror located so as to reflect to the driver a view of the
highway for a distance of at least two hundred (200) feet to the
rear of the vehicle; or
(2) an appropriate, functioning rear view camera that
provides the driver a view of the highway for a distance of at
least two hundred (200) feet to the rear of the vehicle.
SECTION 10. IC 9-21-5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2024,
HEA 1200 — CC 1

7
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 12. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d),
subsections (d) and (e), whenever the Indiana department of
transportation determines on the basis of an engineering and traffic
investigation that a maximum speed set forth in this chapter is greater
or less than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at
an intersection or other place or on part of the state highway system,
the Indiana department of transportation may determine and declare a
reasonable and safe maximum limit at the intersection or on the part of
the state highway system. The differing limit is effective when
appropriate signs giving notice of the limit are erected.
(b) A maximum speed limit under this section may be declared to
be effective at all times or at times indicated on the signs. Differing
limits may be established for different times of day and different types
of vehicles. varying weather conditions, and other factors bearing on
safe speeds. The differing limits are effective when posted on
appropriate fixed or variable signs.
(c) A person who exceeds a speed limit established under this
section commits a Class C infraction.
(d) The Indiana department of transportation may decrease the
speed limit on a highway in its jurisdiction with a functional
classification of minor collector or local road in an urban district to
twenty (20) miles per hour without an engineering and traffic
investigation.
(e) The Indiana department of transportation may not:
(1) implement variable speed limits; or
(2) use electronic variable speed limit signs.
SECTION 11. IC 9-24-3-2.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2025,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) Except as provided in section 3 of this
chapter, an individual must satisfy the requirements set forth in one (1)
of the following subdivisions to receive a driver's license:
(1) The individual meets the following conditions:
(A) Is at least sixteen (16) years and ninety (90) days of age.
(B) Has held a valid learner's permit for at least one hundred
eighty (180) days.
(C) Obtains an instructor's certification that the individual has
satisfactorily completed an approved driver education course.
(D) Passes the required examinations.
(E) Completes at least fifty (50) hours of supervised driving
practice, of which at least ten (10) hours are nighttime driving,
as provided in subsection (b).
HEA 1200 — CC 1

8
(2) The individual meets the following conditions:
(A) Is at least sixteen (16) years and two hundred seventy
(270) days of age.
(B) Has held a valid learner's permit for at least one hundred
eighty (180) days.
(C) Passes the required examinations.
(D) Completes at least fifty (50) hours of supervised driving
practice, of which at least ten (10) hours are nighttime driving,
as provided in subsection (b).
(3) The individual meets the following conditions:
(A) Is at least sixteen (16) years and one hundred eighty (180)
days of age but less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(B) Has previously been a nonresident of Indiana, but, at the
time of application, qualifies as an Indiana resident.
(C) Has held for at least sixty (60) days a valid driver's license,
excluding a learner's permit or the equivalent, in the state or a
combination of states in which the individual formerly resided.
(D) Passes the required examinations.
(4) The individual meets the following conditions:
(A) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(B) Has previously been a nonresident but, at the time of
application, qualifies as an Indiana resident.
(C) Held a valid driver's license, excluding a learner's permit
or the equivalent, from the state or country of prior residence.
(D) Passes the required examinations.
(5) The individual meets the following conditions:
(A) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(B) Is a person with a disability.
(C) Holds an Indiana learner's permit.
(D) Has successfully completed driver rehabilitation training
by a certified driver rehabilitation specialist recognized by the
bureau.
(E) Passes the required examinations.
(6) The individual meets the following conditions:
(A) Is at least sixteen (16) years and ninety (90) days of age.
(B) Is a person with a disability.
(C) Has held a valid learner's permit for at least one hundred
eighty (180) days.
(D) Has successfully completed driver rehabilitation training
by a certified driver rehabilitation specialist recognized by the
bureau.
(E) Passes the required examinations.
HEA 1200 — CC 1

9
(F) Completes at least fifty (50) hours of supervised driving
practice, of which at least ten (10) hours are nighttime driving,
as provided in subsection (b).
(b) An applicant who is required to complete at least fifty (50) hours
of supervised practice driving under subsection (a)(1)(E), (a)(2)(D), or
(a)(6)(F) must do the following:
(1) If the applicant is less than eighteen (18) years of age,
complete the practice driving with:
(A) a licensed driver, with valid driving privileges, who is:
(i) at least twenty-five (25) years of age; and
(ii) related to the applicant by blood, marriage, or legal
status;
(B) the spouse of the applicant who is:
(i) a licensed driver with valid driving privileges; and
(ii) at least twenty-one (21) years of age; or
(C) an individual with valid driving privileges who:
(i) is licensed as a driver education instructor under
IC 9-27-6-8 and is working under the direction of a driver
training school described in IC 9-27-6-3(a)(2); or
(ii) is a certified driver rehabilitation specialist recognized
by the bureau who is employed through a driver
rehabilitation program.
(2) If the applicant is at least eighteen (18) years of age, complete
the driving practice with:
(A) a licensed driver, with valid driving privileges, who is at
least twenty-five (25) years of age; or
(B) the spouse of the applicant who is:
(i) a licensed driver with valid driving privileges; and
(ii) at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3) If the applicant is less than eighteen (18) years of age and is
under the care and supervision of the department of child
services, complete the driving practice with:
(A) a licensed driver with valid driving privileges who is:
(i) at least twenty-five (25) years of age; and
(ii) related to the applicant by blood, marriage, or legal
status;
(B) a licensed driver with valid driving privileges who is:
(i) at least twenty-five (25) years of age; and
(ii) approved by the department of child services; or
(C) an individual with valid driving privileges who is:
(i) licensed as a driver education instructor under
IC 9-27-6-8 and is working under the direction of a driver
HEA 1200 — CC 1

10
training school described in IC 9-27-6-3(a)(2); or
(ii) a certified driver rehabilitation specialist recognized by
the bureau who is employed through a driver rehabilitation
program.
(4) Submit to the commission under IC 9-24-9-2(c) evidence of
the time logged in practice driving.
SECTION 12. IC 9-24-6.1-2.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2.7. (a) An individual must be
able to demonstrate proficiency of the English language sufficient
to:
(1) converse with the general public;
(2) understand highway traffic signs and signals in the English
language;
(3) respond to official inquiries; and
(4) make entries on reports in records;
to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(b) An individual must take and pass a knowledge exam and a
skills exam in:
(1) English; or
(2) American Sign Language;
to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
SECTION 13. IC 9-24-6.1-3.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.3. (a) If an individual:
(1) makes, presents, or uses a public record with knowledge of
the falsity of the public record and with the intent that the
public record be taken as genuine; and
(2) represents that a false public record made, presented, or
used is a valid commercial driver's license under section 3 of
this chapter;
the individual commits a Level 6 felony.
(b) If an individual knowingly:
(1) holds a commercial driver's license that was issued by any
jurisdiction other than a state, territory, or possession of the
United States; and
(2) does not have the additional entry documents required
under 8 CFR 214.2(b)(4) in the individual's possession while
operating a commercial motor vehicle;
the individual commits a Level 6 felony.
(c) If an individual violates subsection (a) or (b), in addition to
the criminal penalties, the following apply:
HEA 1200 — CC 1

11
(1) The individual is subject to a civil penalty of five thousand
dollars ($5,000).
(2) The business entity that hired the individual to operate the
commercial motor vehicle the individual was operating at the
time of the violation is subject to a civil penalty of fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000).
SECTION 14. IC 9-24-6.1-3.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.4. (a) As used in this section,
"business enterprise" means a person or entity that educates,
trains, or otherwise prepares an individual to operate a
commercial motor vehicle.
(b) A business enterprise may not educate, train, or otherwise
prepare an individual to operate a commercial motor vehicle if:
(1) the individual is ineligible to obtain a commercial driver's
license under Indiana law or federal law; and
(2) the business enterprise knew or, in the exercise of
reasonable diligence, should have known of the individual's
ineligibility.
(c) A business enterprise that violates subsection (b) is subject
to a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each
violation.
(d) A business enterprise may not operate in substantial
noncompliance with applicable commercial driver training
standards established under federal law or Indiana law.
(e) A business enterprise that violates subsection (d) is subject
to a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each
violation.
(f) The attorney general shall enforce this section and may bring
an action to:
(1) collect a civil penalty imposed under this section; and
(2) recover the reasonable costs of investigation and
enforcement, including attorney's fees.
(g) A civil penalty collected by the attorney general under this
section must be deposited in the attorney general contingency fee
fund established by IC 4-6-16-6.
SECTION 15. IC 9-24-6.1-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2017,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10. (a) As used in this section, "nondomiciled
commercial driver's license" means a commercial driver's license that
is issued to an individual who is domiciled:
(1) in a foreign country meeting the requirements of 49 CFR
HEA 1200 — CC 1

12
383.23(b)(1); or
(2) in another state meeting the requirements of 49 CFR
383.23(b)(2).
(b) After December 31, 2017, the bureau shall issue a nondomiciled
commercial driver's license in accordance with 49 CFR 383.23 to an
individual who:
(1) submits a proper application under this article; and
(2) meets the requirements of 49 CFR 383.71(f).
(c) The bureau may create an application form or other required
documents to implement this section.
(d) The fee for a nondomiciled commercial driver's license is the
same as for a commercial driver's license under section 4 of this
chapter.
(e) A nondomiciled commercial driver's license is subject to the
same restrictions and requirements as a commercial driver's license
under this chapter.
(f) Notwithstanding any other grounds for the revocation or
suspension of a commercial driver's license, the bureau shall
revoke an individual's nondomiciled commercial driver's license if
the individual no longer possesses the legal status or documentation
that was required at the time the individual's nondomiciled
commercial driver's license was granted. The effective date of a
revocation under this subsection is the earlier of:
(1) fifteen (15) days after the date the bureau mails the notice
of the revocation; or
(2) the conclusion of a proceeding initiated pursuant to
IC 4-21.5-3.
(g) If the bureau receives credible information from a federal
agency, including information provided by the Federal Motor
Carrier Safety Administration, the United States Department of
Homeland Security, the United States Department of State, or
another federal agency, that an individual no longer possesses the
legal status or documentation that was required to obtain a
nondomiciled commercial driver's license at the time the
individual's license was granted, the bureau shall verify the status
of and documentation possessed by the individual through the
Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements program operated
by the United States Department of Homeland Security or a
successor program designated by the United States Department of
Homeland Security.
(h) The bureau shall periodically consult with the United States
Department of Homeland Security to identify individuals whose
HEA 1200 — CC 1

13
nondomiciled commercial driver's licenses may be subject to
revocation under subsection (f).
(i) A nondomiciled commercial driver's license issued prior to
March 1, 2026, to an individual who:
(1) is domiciled in a foreign country; and
(2) does not hold H-2A, H-2B, or E-2 nonimmigrant status
under the Immigration and Nationality Act;
expires on April 1, 2026.
(f) (j) The bureau may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
SECTION 16. IC 9-24-8.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 35, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The bureau shall add a motorcycle
endorsement to a driver's license if the holder meets the following
conditions:
(1) Is at least:
(A) sixteen (16) years and ninety (90) days of age and has
completed a motorcycle operator safety education course
approved by the bureau under IC 9-27-7; or
(B) sixteen (16) years and two hundred seventy (270) days of
age.
(2) Makes a proper application in the form and manner prescribed
by the bureau.
(3) Has passed a written examination developed by the bureau
concerning the safe operation of a motorcycle.
(4) Satisfactorily completes an operational skills test at a location
approved by the bureau.
(5) Pays a fee of nineteen dollars ($19). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the motor
vehicle highway account.
(C) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(D) Sixteen dollars ($16) to the commission fund.
(b) The bureau may waive the testing requirements under subsection
(a)(3) and (a)(4) for an individual who satisfactorily completes a
motorcycle operator safety course approved by the bureau as set forth
in IC 9-27-7.
(c) The bureau may waive the operational skills test under
subsection (a)(4) for an individual who holds a valid motorcycle
HEA 1200 — CC 1

14
endorsement or motorcycle license from any other jurisdiction.
(d) An individual who fails the operational skills test under
subsection (a)(4) three (3) consecutive times is not eligible to retake
the test until two (2) months after the date of the most recent failed test.
(e) The fee for a motorcycle operational skills test administered
under this chapter is as follows:
(1) For tests given by state employees, the fee is five dollars ($5)
and shall be deposited in the motor vehicle highway account
under IC 8-14-1.
(2) For tests given by a contractor approved by the bureau, the fee
is:
(A) determined under rules adopted by the bureau under
IC 4-22-2 to cover the direct costs of administering the test;
and
(B) paid to the contractor.
(f) The bureau may impose an additional fee of twenty-five dollars
($25) if the bureau processes an application for a physical credential
under this chapter in a period of time that is shorter than the normal
processing period. The bureau shall deposit the fee in the commission
fund.
(g) A fee imposed under this section is in addition to any other fee
imposed under this chapter.
SECTION 17. IC 9-24-9-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2025,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), each
application for a driver's license or permit under this chapter must
require the following information:
(1) The full legal name of the applicant.
(2) The applicant's date of birth.
(3) The gender of the applicant.
(4) The applicant's height, weight, hair color, and eye color.
(5) The address of the applicant.
(6) A:
(A) valid Social Security number; or
(B) verification of an applicant's:
(i) ineligibility to be issued a Social Security number;
(ii) identity; and
(iii) lawful status.
(7) Whether the applicant has been subject to fainting spells or
seizures.
(8) Whether the applicant has been issued a driver's license or has
been the holder of a permit, and if so, when and by what
HEA 1200 — CC 1

15
jurisdiction.
(9) Whether the applicant's driver's license or permit has ever
been suspended or revoked, and if so, the date of and the reason
for the suspension or revocation.
(10) Whether the applicant has been convicted of:
(A) a crime punishable as a felony under Indiana motor
vehicle law; or
(B) any other felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
that has not been expunged by a court.
(11) (9) Whether the applicant has a physical or mental disability,
and if so, the nature of the disability.
(12) (10) The signature of the applicant showing the applicant's
legal name as it appears or will appear on the driver's license or
permit.
(13) (11) A digital photograph of the applicant.
(14) (12) Any other information the bureau requires.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), an individual certified as a
program participant in the address confidentiality program under
IC 5-26.5 is not required to provide the individual's address, but may
provide an address designated by the office of the attorney general
under IC 5-26.5 as the individual's address.
(c) In addition to the information required by subsection (a), an
applicant who is required to complete at least fifty (50) hours of
supervised practice driving under IC 9-24-3-2.5(a)(1)(E),
IC 9-24-3-2.5(a)(2)(D), or IC 9-24-3-2.5(a)(6)(F) must submit to the
bureau evidence of the time logged in practice driving.
SECTION 18. IC 9-24-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.256-2017,
SECTION 173, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) An individual who
applies under this chapter for a permit or driver's license and who is
required by this chapter to take an examination of the applicant's skill
in the operation of a motor vehicle under section 4(a)(2) of this
chapter shall:
(1) appear before a member of the bureau or commission; or
(2) appear before an instructor having an endorsement under
IC 9-27-6-8;
and be examined concerning the applicant's qualifications and ability
to operate a motor vehicle upon a highway.
(b) An individual who applies under this chapter for a permit or
driver's license and who is required to take an examination of the
applicant's ability to read and understand highway signs under
HEA 1200 — CC 1

16
section 4(a)(1)(B) of this chapter and the applicant's knowledge of
Indiana traffic laws under section 4(a)(1)(C) of this chapter shall:
(1) appear before a member of the bureau or commission;
(2) appear before an instructor having an endorsement under
IC 9-27-6-8; or
(3) satisfactorily complete an online examination approved by
the bureau;
and be examined concerning the applicant's qualifications and
ability to operate a motor vehicle upon a highway.
SECTION 19. IC 9-24-12-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c)
and (d), the application for renewal of:
(1) a driver's license;
(2) a chauffeur's license (before the expiration of IC 9-24-4 on
July 1, 2024);
(3) a public passenger chauffeur's license (before the expiration
of IC 9-24-5 on July 1, 2022);
(4) an identification card; or
(5) a photo exempt identification card;
under this article may be filed not more than twenty-four (24) months
before the expiration date of the license, identification card, or photo
exempt identification card held by the applicant.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), an application for
the renewal of a learner's permit issued under this article may be filed
not more than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the learner's
permit.
(c) When the applicant complies with IC 9-24-9-2.5, an application
for renewal of a driver's license in subsection (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3)
may be filed not more than one (1) month thirty (30) days before the
expiration date of the license held by the applicant.
(d) When the applicant complies with IC 9-24-16-3.5, an application
for renewal of an identification card under subsection (a)(4) may be
filed not more than one (1) month thirty (30) days before the
expiration date of the identification card held by the applicant.
SECTION 20. IC 9-24-12-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2023,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), and
subject to subsection (d), an individual applying for renewal of a
driver's license in the form of a physical credential (issued under
IC 9-24-3), or a chauffeur's or a public passenger chauffeur's license,
including any endorsements in effect with respect to the license, must
HEA 1200 — CC 1

17
apply in person at a license branch and do the following:
(1) Pass an eyesight examination.
(2) Pass a written examination if:
(A) the applicant has at least six (6) active points on the
applicant's driving record maintained by the bureau;
(B) the applicant has not reached the applicant's twenty-first
birthday and has active points on the applicant's driving record
maintained by the bureau; or
(C) the applicant is in possession of a driver's license that is
expired beyond one hundred eighty (180) days.
(b) The holder of a driver's license in the form of a physical
credential (issued under IC 9-24-3), a chauffeur's or a public passenger
chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued in the form of a physical
credential under IC 9-24-7 may renew the license, including any
endorsements in effect with respect to the license, by mail or by
electronic service, subject to the following conditions:
(1) A valid computerized image of the individual must exist
within the records of the bureau.
(2) The previous renewal of the individual's driver's license
(issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's or public passenger
chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued under IC 9-24-7
must not have been by mail or by electronic service.
(3) The application for or previous renewal of the individual's
license or permit must have included a test of the individual's
eyesight approved by the bureau.
(4) If the individual were applying for the license or permit
renewal in person at a license branch, the individual would not be
required under subsection (a)(2) to submit to a written
examination.
(5) The individual must be a citizen of the United States, as
shown in the records of the bureau.
(6) There must not have been any change in the:
(A) address; or
(B) name;
of the individual since the issuance or previous renewal of the
individual's driver's license (issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's
or public passenger chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit
issued under IC 9-24-7.
(7) The driver's license (issued under IC 9-24-3), chauffeur's or
public passenger chauffeur's license, or a learner's permit issued
under IC 9-24-7 of the individual must not be:
(A) suspended; or
HEA 1200 — CC 1

18
(B) expired more than one hundred eighty (180) days;
at the time of the application for renewal.
(8) If the individual is seventy-five (75) years of age or older at
the time of the application for renewal, the individual must
provide proof, on a form approved by the bureau, that the
individual has passed an eyesight examination within thirty (30)
sixty (60) days prior to the renewal application.
(c) An individual applying for the renewal of a driver's license
issued in the form of a physical credential (issued under IC 9-24-3), a
chauffeur's license or a public passenger chauffeur's license, or a
learner's permit issued in the form of a physical credential under
IC 9-24-7, including any endorsements in effect with respect to the
license, must apply in person at a license branch under subsection (a)
if the individual is not entitled to apply by mail or by electronic service
under subsection (b).
(d) The bureau may not issue or renew a chauffeur's or a public
passenger chauffeur's license after December 31, 2016. If a holder of
a chauffeur's or a public passenger chauffeur's license applies after
December 31, 2016, for renewal of the chauffeur's or public passenger
chauffeur's license, the bureau shall issue to the holder a driver's
license under IC 9-24-3 with a for-hire endorsement if the holder:
(1) applies in a form and manner prescribed by the bureau; and
(2) satisfies the requirements for renewal of a driver's license
issued under IC 9-24-3, including the fee and examination
requirements under this section.
(e) An individual applying for the renewal of a driver's license
issued in the form of a physical credential under IC 9-24-3 shall pay the
following applicable fee:
(1) If the individual is less than seventy-five (75) years of age,
seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50). The fee shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) Two dollars ($2) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) Four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) to the motor vehicle
highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(E) Nine dollars and twenty-five cents ($9.25) to the
commission fund.
(2) If the individual is at least seventy-five (75) years of age and
less than eighty-five (85) years of age, eleven dollars ($11). The
HEA 1200 — CC 1

19
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to the crossroads 2000
fund.
(C) Three dollars ($3) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(E) Four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75) to the
commission fund.
(3) If the individual is at least eighty-five (85) years of age, seven
dollars ($7). The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(B) One dollar ($1) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(C) Two dollars ($2) to the motor vehicle highway account.
(D) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(E) Two dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) to the
commission fund.
A fee paid under this subsection after December 31, 2016, includes the
renewal of any endorsements that are in effect with respect to the
driver's license issued in the form of a physical credential under
IC 9-24-3 at the time of renewal.
SECTION 21. IC 9-24-12-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. (a) When the Indiana driver's license of
an individual who is temporarily residing outside Indiana because of
service in the armed forces of the United States has expired, the driver's
license remains valid for ninety (90) days following the individual's
discharge from service in the armed forces or postdeployment in the
armed forces. date the individual is no longer temporarily residing
outside Indiana because of the individual's service. To obtain a
renewed driver's license, the individual must do the following:
(1) Apply for a renewal of the driver's license during the ninety
(90) day period following the individual's discharge or
postdeployment in the armed forces. date the individual is no
longer temporarily residing outside Indiana because of the
individual's service.
(2) Show proof of discharge from temporary residence outside
of Indiana because of service in the armed forces or status as
postdeployment in the armed forces to the bureau when applying
HEA 1200 — CC 1

20
for the renewal.
An individual who held a commercial driver's license that expired
during the individual's service in the armed forces may renew the
commercial driver's license as if the commercial driver's license had
not expired but had remained valid during the period of service in the
armed forces of the United States.
(b) When the Indiana driver's license of an individual who is
temporarily residing outside Indiana because of the service of a spouse,
parent, or guardian in the armed forces of the United States has
expired, the driver's license remains valid for ninety (90) days
following the discharge from service in the armed forces or end of
deployment in the armed forces of date the individual's spouse, parent,
or guardian is no longer temporarily residing outside Indiana
because of the individual's service. To obtain a renewed driver's
license, the individual must do the following:
(1) Apply for a renewal of the driver's license during the ninety
(90) day period following the discharge from or end of
deployment in the armed forces of date the individual's spouse,
parent, or guardian is no longer temporarily residing outside
Indiana.
(2) Show to the bureau proof of discharge or end of deployment
in the armed forces of that the individual's spouse, parent, or
guardian is no longer temporarily residing outside Indiana
when applying for the renewal.
SECTION 22. IC 9-24-16-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.5. (a) An individual may apply for a
replacement identification card issued in the form of a physical
credential under section 9 of this chapter, apply for a replacement
identification card issued in the form of a physical credential under
section 6 of this chapter, or convert a driver's license or learner's permit
into an identification card under IC 9-24-14-3.5 by electronic service.
An individual's renewal, amendment, or replacement of, or conversion
to, an identification card issued in the form of a physical credential by
electronic service is subject to the following conditions:
(1) A valid computerized image or digital photograph of the
individual must exist within the records of the bureau.
(2) The individual must be a citizen of the United States, as
shown in the records of the bureau.
(3) There must not have been any change in the:
(A) legal address; or
(B) name;
HEA 1200 — CC 1

21
of the individual since the issuance or previous renewal of the
identification card issued in the form of a physical credential of
the individual.
(4) The identification card issued in the form of a physical
credential of the individual must not be expired more than one
hundred eighty (180) days at the time of the application for
renewal.
(b) An individual applying for:
(1) the renewal of an identification card; or
(2) a replacement identification card;
must apply in person if the individual is not entitled to apply by mail or
by electronic service under subsection (a).
SECTION 23. IC 9-24-16-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2025,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) An application for renewal of an
identification card issued in the form of a physical credential may be
made not more than twenty-four (24) months before the expiration date
of the card issued in the form of a physical credential. However, when
the applicant complies with section 3.5 of this chapter, an application
for renewal of an identification card issued in the form of a physical
credential may be filed not more than one (1) month thirty (30) days
before the expiration date of the identification card issued in the form
of a physical credential held by the applicant.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d), a renewed card issued in
the form of a physical credential is valid on the birth date of the holder
and remains valid for six (6) years.
(c) Renewal may not be granted if the cardholder was issued a
driver's license issued in the form of a physical credential subsequent
to the last issuance of an identification card issued in the form of a
physical credential.
(d) A renewed identification card issued under this article in the
form of a physical credential to an applicant who complies with section
3.5 of this chapter expires:
(1) at midnight one (1) year after issuance, if there is no
expiration date on the authorization granted to the individual to
remain in the United States; or
(2) if there is an expiration date on the authorization granted to
the individual to remain in the United States, the earlier of the
following:
(A) At midnight of the date the authorization of the holder to
have lawful status as a permanent resident or conditional
resident alien of the United States expires.
HEA 1200 — CC 1

22
(B) At midnight of the birthday of the holder that occurs six
(6) years after the date of issuance.
(e) An identification card expires upon the bureau receiving notice
of the death of the holder or upon issuance of a subsequent physical
credential.
SECTION 24. IC 9-28-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2007,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The department of state revenue, on behalf
of the state, may enter into reciprocal agreements providing for the
registration of vehicles on an apportionment or allocation basis with the
proper authority of any state, any commonwealth, the District of
Columbia, a state or province of a foreign country, or a territory or
possession of either the United States or of a foreign country.
(b) To implement this chapter, the state may enter into and become
a member of the International Registration Plan or other designation
that may be given to a reciprocity plan developed by the American
Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.
(c) The department of state revenue may adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to carry out and enforce the provisions of the International
Registration Plan or any other agreement entered into under this
chapter.
(d) If the state enters into the International Registration Plan or into
any other agreement under this chapter, and if the provisions set forth
in the plan or other agreements are different from provisions prescribed
by law, then the agreement provisions prevail.
(e) All payments for the renewal of a fleet of vehicles previously
registered under the International Registration Plan are due on or
before the fifteenth last day of the last month of the registration period
preceding the period being renewed.
(f) All payments for billings, other than renewal, issued under the
International Registration Plan are due within fifteen (15) days after the
mailing date on the billing unless stated otherwise.
(g) This chapter constitutes complete authority for the registration
of vehicles, including the registration of fleet vehicles, upon an
apportionment or allocation basis without reference to or application
of any other Indiana law.
(h) A person who fails to comply with subsections (e) and (f) is
subject to the penalties and interest imposed under IC 6-8.1-10.
SECTION 25. IC 24-4-26-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to the advertisement
of a:
(1) product containing marijuana; or
HEA 1200 — CC 1

23
(2) controlled substance listed in schedule I of IC 35-48-2;
pursuant to a contract that was entered into or renewed before the
effective date of this chapter as enacted by the 2025 general assembly.
SECTION 26. IC 24-4-26-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.227-2025,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) A person may not advertise a:
(1) product containing marijuana; or
(2) controlled substance listed in schedule I of IC 35-48-2;
by any medium.
(b) An advertisement in violation of subsection (a) must be
removed from public circulation and not available to be viewed by
the public not later than October 1, 2026.
SECTION 27. IC 35-52-9.1-30.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 30.5. IC 9-24-6.1-3.3 defines
a crime concerning commercial motor vehicles.
SECTION 28. IC 36-6-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.173-2025,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Before July 1, 2025, January 1, 2028, this
chapter applies to a township if the total amount of funds in a
township's capital improvement funds exceeds:
(1) one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the township's total
annual budget estimate prepared under IC 6-1.1-17-2 for the
ensuing year; and
(2) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).
(b) After June 30, 2025, December 31, 2027, this chapter applies
to all townships, including those townships that have merged under
IC 36-6-1.5 or reorganized under IC 36-1.5.
SECTION 29. IC 36-6-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.173-2025,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. A township that meets the requirements of
section 5 of this chapter must:
(1) adopt a capital improvement plan not later than September 30
of each calendar year; and
(2) submit a copy of the adopted capital improvement plan to the
department of local government finance not later than five (5)
business days after a budget is adopted under
IC 6-1.1-17-5(a). The submission must be in the manner
prescribed by the department.
SECTION 30. IC 36-6-9-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.129-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. A The plan adopted in the immediately
HEA 1200 — CC 1

24
preceding calendar year shall be considered by the county fiscal body
in reviewing the township budget under IC 6-1.1-17-3.6.
SECTION 31. IC 36-6-9-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.173-2025,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Beginning July 1, 2025, January 1, 2028,
a township must adopt a plan on an annual basis. The township must
file the plan with the department of local government finance in the
form and manner prescribed by the department of local government
finance.
(b) A plan must include:
(1) the balance of all unrestricted funds that exceed the township's
budget for the following year; and
(2) the purpose for which all unrestricted funds are being retained.
SECTION 33. An emergency is declared for this act.
HEA 1200 — CC 1

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1200 — CC 1